Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 10 Transition Provisions; Fees of Secretary of State

7-1-860.
Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to transactions and events occurring on and after April 1, 1975.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3701, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-861.
Completion of pending transactions; continuation of existing charters, appointments, regulations, and fees.

Transactions validly entered into before April 1, 1975, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from them remain valid thereafter and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced as required or permitted by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this chapter as though such repeal or amendment had not occurred.

The validity of existing articles and charters shall not be impaired by this chapter. Appointments of officers in effect on April 1, 1975, shall continue in force until changed as permitted by this chapter or other applicable law. Regulations which have been issued by the department or the commissioner and fee schedules established by either of them or existing pursuant to statute shall remain in effect until changed pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3702, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-862.
Fees to be paid to Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect fees with regard to filings by persons subject to the provisions of this chapter to the same extent as are charged and collected with regard to similar filings by corporations organized under Chapter 2 of Title 14, known as the “Georgia Business Corporation Code.”

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3703, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 21; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 32.

Cross references.

Fees to be paid to Secretary of State for filing documents and issuing certificates pertaining to Secretary of State corporations, §

14-4-183

.